District of Columbia statutes.
38-651.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Emergency circumstances” means reasonably apparent circumstances that indicate that any delay in treatment would endanger the health or life of the student.

(2)

“Medication” means any prescription or non-prescription drug used to treat conditions and illnesses covered by this subchapter.

(3)

“Medication action plan” means a written medical treatment plan for an individual student that is developed and submitted to a school in accordance with § 38-651.03.

(4)

“Responsible person” means, in the case of a student under 18 years of age, a parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, foster parent, or other adult charged with the ongoing care and supervision of the student, and, in the case of a student 18 years of age or older, the student himself or herself.

(5)

“School” means:

(A)

Any public school operated under the authority of the Mayor of the District of Columbia; and

(B)

Any charter school, parochial school, or private school in the District.

History

Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 2, 54 DCR 12230

Temporary Addition of Section

Section 2 of Law 17-52 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 2. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this act, the term:
“(1) ‘Medication action plan’ means a written medical treatment plan for an individual student with prescription medication that is developed and submitted to a school in accordance with section 4.
“(2) ‘Responsible person’ means, in the case of a student under 18 years of age, a parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, foster parent, or other adult charged with the ongoing care and supervision of the student, and in the case of a student 18 years of age or older, the student himself or herself.
“(3) ‘School’ means:
“(A) Any public school operated under the authority of the Mayor of the District of Columbia; and
“(B) Any charter school, parochial school, or private school in the District.”
Section 11(b) of D.C. Law 17-52 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Student Access to Treatment Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-82, July 26,